South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S700.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-13-810 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (D) Notwithstanding any provisions of this article, section, or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, a childcare provider on a military installation or a facility licensed or certified as a family childcare provider by the Department of Defense, a branch of the United States Department of Defense, or the United States Coast Guard shall be exempt from the requirements of this article. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----